Hawaii statutes.
[§167-8] Investment of funds. The
director of finance may authorize the investment of any funds held in reserves,
or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities
in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control. [L
1987, c 306, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next